Hawaii, session 2025, HB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The department of land and natural resources shall conduct a carrying capacity study of Kikiaola small boat harbor in the county of Kauai. The study shall: (1)  Include an assessment of the carrying capacity of the Kikiaola small boat harbor, including an estimate of the number of persons and the amount of human activity that the harbor can sustain without degrading natural resources, cultural resources, or experiences by visitors and residents; (2)  Assess the effectiveness of existing use restrictions and management practices; (3)  Determine whether commercial tour operators have been allowed by the department to increase the number of passengers allowed in their operations without review or understanding of the effects on the harbor's infrastructure or natural resources; (4)  Assess the potential effectiveness of visitor use restrictions and management practices; and (5)  Propose long-term management options to reduce the impact of humans on the health and abundance of natural resources, cultural resources, and native species within and around the harbor. (b) In conducting the study, the department of land and natural resources shall consult with the county of Kauai, relevant community organizations, and other relevant entities. (c) The department of land and natural resources shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the department of land and natural resources to conduct a carrying capacity study of Kikiaola small boat harbor in the county of Kauai. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________